Wyoming statutes. Title 19 Defense Forces and Affairs
Article 7. Fiscal Provisions

§ 19-2-701.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1969, ch. 72, § 43, related to the sale of property under the control of adjutant general.

§ 19-2-702.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §

19-7-202

by Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 4.

§ 19-2-703.
[Amended and Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

19-7-203

by Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3.